Louisiana, session 2026, HB812.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1907(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
47:1907(N) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1907. Salaries
A.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, except the
provisions of Subsections H through M N of this Section, in the performance of all
duties required of them by law, the assessors of the various parishes shall receive an
annual compensation, to be paid monthly on their own warrant, based on the
applicable population of the respective parishes, not to exceed the compensation
schedule provided for in this Paragraph according to the latest decennial United
States Census or the population estimates published pursuant to the United States
Bureau of the Census Federal State Cooperative Program for Population Estimates.
Population Compensation
(a) Greater than 250,000 or greater $108,290
(b) 50,001 to 249,999 $98,290
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 812 ENROLLED
(c) 50,000 or less $88,290
* * *
N.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, in addition to
all other forms of compensation which are authorized for assessors by the provisions
of this Section, the annual compensation for each assessor shall be increased by five
percent annually through calendar year 2029. The additional compensation
authorized by this Subsection shall become effective only if the assessor publishes
notice of intent to increase his compensation on two separate days in the official
journal of the parish in which the assessor's office is situated. The last day of
publication of the notice shall be at least thirty days prior to the date that the assessor
increases his compensation.
(2) No assessor who, for any taxable year ending after December 31, 2025,
assesses property in violation of the exemption provided in R.S. 47:6001 shall be
eligible for any compensation increase authorized by Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection.
Section 2. The intent of this Act is to authorize for each assessor four compensation
increases, in the number of one increase per year, during the 2026, 2027, 2028, and 2029
calendar years unless prohibited by the provisions of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.